Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Chapter 41. Mississippi Agribusiness Council Act of 1993

§ 69-41-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Agribusiness Council Act of 1993.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 619, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 536, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1998).

§ 69-41-3.
Mississippi Agribusiness Council created; purpose.

There is created a special joint committee of the Legislature to be known as the Mississippi Agribusiness Council, hereinafter referred to as “the council,” for the purposes of stimulating the development of new markets for Mississippi agricultural products and industry.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 619, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 536, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1998).

§ 69-41-5.
Composition of council; co-participation with other persons and organizations; authorization of contracts and agreements; per diem, mileage and other expenses.

The council shall be composed of the following members:

The Chairman and Vice-Chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee and five (5) additional members of the Senate, no more than two (2) members from one (1) congressional district. Upon recommendation by the Chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee, the Lieutenant Governor shall appoint such five (5) additional members.

The Chairman and Vice-Chairman of the House of Representatives Agriculture Committee and five (5) additional members of the House, no more than two (2) members from one (1) congressional district. Upon recommendation by the Chairman of the House of Representatives Agriculture Committee, the Speaker shall appoint such five (5) additional members.

The Chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee and the Chairman of the House of Representatives Agriculture Committee shall serve as Co-Chairmen of the council.

In conducting the studies and formulating the recommendations required of it, the council may elicit the support of and participation by any commercial, industrial, governmental, agricultural, minority and public interest organizations or associations, or individual members thereof, and any federal, state and local agencies and political subdivisions as may be necessary, or appropriate in the furtherance of the activities of the council.

In addition, the council shall be authorized to contract or enter into agreements with other agencies or private research centers that it may deem necessary to carry out its duties and functions.

For attending meetings of the council, each legislative member shall receive per diem and expenses which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session. However, no per diem and expenses shall be paid for attending meetings of the council while the Legislature is in session, and no per diem and expenses shall be paid without prior approval of the proper committee in the member’s respective house. However, per diem and travel expenses incurred by members of the council which are not incurred for the purpose of attending regular council meetings may be paid out of funds appropriated to the Mississippi Agribusiness Council in the amount provided by Sections 5-1-45 and 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 619, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 589, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 536, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1998).

§ 69-41-7.
Executive director; qualifications; compensation; duties; staff.

The council may appoint a nonstate service executive director, herein called director, who shall be competent and qualified in the area of marketing and agriculture and who may receive as compensation for services an annual salary as set by the council, but not to exceed the annual salary of the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce. The director shall be the one-point information contact on agricultural production, management and marketing issues and shall be charged with the duty of knowing the role and responsible personnel in each agency on matters related to agriculture. The director, or a staff member as designated by the council, shall be directly responsible to the council for tasks assigned in the administration and implementation of programs developed by the council. The council may also employ such nonstate staff as necessary to perform the objectives of the council, whose salary shall be set by the council but not to exceed an amount recommended by the State Personnel Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 619, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 589, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 536, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1998).

§ 69-41-9.
Duties and responsibilities of council.

The duties and responsibilities of the council shall be the following:

To conduct national and international market research to identify trade and investment opportunities;

To identify joint ventures and licensing services;

To conduct market studies to identify agricultural products that can be manufactured in Mississippi from materials and resources available in or to Mississippi for which a profitable and growing market exists;

To recommend legislation to assist with financial packaging by utilizing all available fund resources provided by the State of Mississippi including, but not limited to, the Small Business Investment Act, Emerging Crop Fund and the Business Financial Investment Act;

To establish a Mississippi Register of Mississippi Agricultural Producers for public policymaking purposes, and set criteria for listing therein;

To recommend purchasing agreements between state institutions and Mississippi agricultural producers which shall not include suggested prices;

To recommend the enactment of legislation organizing the state into marketing districts for the most effective and efficient use of marketing resources;

To provide any other assistance and services necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 619, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 536, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1998).

§ 69-41-11.
Council authorized to establish rules.

The council is authorized and empowered to promulgate rules required to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 619, § 6; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 536, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1998).

§ 69-41-13.
Authorization to accept and expend monies and in-kind contributions; Agribusiness Council Contribution Fund.

The Mississippi Agribusiness Council is authorized and empowered to accept and expend monetary or in-kind contributions, gifts and grants to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Such contributions, gifts and grants shall be deposited into a special fund, hereby established in the State Treasury, to be known as the “Agribusiness Council Contribution Fund.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 619, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 536, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1998).

§§ 69-41-15 and 69-41-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1998, ch. 536, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1998).

§69-41-15. [Laws, 1993, ch. 619, § 8; Laws, 1997, ch. 589, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1997]

§69-41-17. [Laws, 1993, ch. 619, § 10, eff by operation of law upon passage (approved April 20, 1993)]

§ 69-41-19.
Agriculture Development Committee.

The Agriculture Development Committee is created and shall be composed of agriculture business leaders and farmers as are appointed by the Mississippi Agribusiness Council; one (1) of the members shall be a representative of Mississippi State University, and one (1) shall be a representative of Alcorn State University. The Development Committee shall work with the Mississippi Agribusiness Council in carrying out its duties and purposes. Members of the Development Committee shall serve without compensation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 589, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1997.